Washington statutes.
RCW 41.05.360

Salary reduction plan—Construction.

RCW 41.05.123, 41.05.300 through 41.05.350, and 41.05.295 shall be construed to effectuate the purposes of 26 U.S.C. Sec. 125 and other applicable sections of the internal revenue code as required.

[ 2008 c 229 s 10; 1995 1st sp.s. c 6 s 17.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2008 c 229: See note following RCW 41.05.295.

Effective date—1995 1st sp.s. c 6: See note following RCW 28A.400.410.